lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4001 Y 1
SFX 4001 0 තයා .
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 දුන් .
SFX 2745 Y 1
SFX 2745 0 තයි .
SFX 1257 Y 1
SFX 1257 0 තයේ .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 0 ්හි .
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 0 පතිවරයා .
SFX 3389 Y 1
SFX 3389 0 සුන්ව .
SFX 2517 Y 1
SFX 2517 0 වන්නන්ට .
SFX 2415 Y 1
SFX 2415 0 ස්ට් .
SFX 3263 Y 1
SFX 3263 0 ාර්ථයෙන් .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 ෙහිලා .
SFX 4262 Y 1
SFX 4262 0 ්වරක් .
SFX 2354 Y 1
SFX 2354 0 ැන් .
SFX 1879 Y 1
SFX 1879 0 ැනි .
SFX 4866 Y 1
SFX 4866 0 ුනෙන් .
SFX 1515 Y 1
SFX 1515 0 ුමක .
SFX 704 Y 1
SFX 704 0 ුමට .
SFX 4844 Y 1
SFX 4844 0 ුමද .
SFX 1822 Y 1
SFX 1822 0 ුමය .
SFX 1402 Y 1
SFX 1402 0 භාවයට .
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 0 ලන්නට .
SFX 2410 Y 1
SFX 2410 0 හාර .
SFX 3410 Y 1
SFX 3410 0 සලෙන් .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 ුම් .
SFX 1735 Y 1
SFX 1735 0 කැට .
SFX 4838 Y 1
SFX 4838 0 ුමා .
SFX 4834 Y 1
SFX 4834 0 ුමු .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 කින් .
SFX 834 Y 1
SFX 834 0 ුමේ .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 කිනි .
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 කැර .
SFX 1093 Y 1
SFX 1093 0 නින් .
SFX 3618 Y 1
SFX 3618 0 ලන්නේ .
SFX 2252 Y 1
SFX 2252 0 ුළු .
SFX 3372 Y 1
SFX 3372 0 ස්වලට .
SFX 2053 Y 1
SFX 2053 0 මයෙන් .
SFX 4759 Y 1
SFX 4759 0 ූණු .
SFX 3705 Y 1
SFX 3705 0 යවන්නේ .
SFX 4182 Y 1
SFX 4182 0 ්සුව .
SFX 4369 Y 1
SFX 4369 0 ්යක්ෂම .
SFX 3246 Y 1
SFX 3246 0 ාශයේ .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 යකින් .
SFX 1398 Y 1
SFX 1398 0 යයන් .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 0 යකිනි .
SFX 1630 Y 1
SFX 1630 0 ලටත් .
SFX 4282 Y 1
SFX 4282 0 ්ලෙක් .
SFX 4283 Y 1
SFX 4283 0 ්ලෙකි .
SFX 4092 Y 1
SFX 4092 0 ගතයේ .
SFX 3417 Y 1
SFX 3417 0 සයන් .
SFX 3255 Y 1
SFX 3255 0 ාලෝකය .
SFX 2189 Y 1
SFX 2189 0 ්‍යාත්මක .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 ච්ච .
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 0 ටවත් .
SFX 3273 Y 1
SFX 3273 0 ාරච්චි .
SFX 3123 Y 1
SFX 3123 0 ියාවෙන් .
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 0 ිත්වය .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 ාංග .
SFX 739 Y 1
SFX 739 0 නීය .
SFX 4356 Y 1
SFX 4356 0 ්‍යතාවයේ .
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 0 ාංශ .
SFX 3518 Y 1
SFX 3518 0 වල්වල .
SFX 3258 Y 1
SFX 3258 0 ාලවල .
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 0 ්වත්ත .
SFX 1874 Y 1
SFX 1874 0 ැස් .
SFX 4493 Y 1
SFX 4493 0 ්තියට .
SFX 941 Y 1
SFX 941 0 ාරක්ෂක .
SFX 3340 Y 1
SFX 3340 0 හුද .
SFX 3205 Y 1
SFX 3205 0 ෑවක් .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 යටයි .
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 0 ුල් .
SFX 3052 Y 1
SFX 3052 0 ුලු .
SFX 4799 Y 1
SFX 4799 0 ුලේ .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 0 කත්වයක් .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 තාවෙන් .
SFX 2402 Y 1
SFX 2402 0 ළුවක් .
SFX 809 Y 1
SFX 809 0 තාවට .
SFX 4348 Y 1
SFX 4348 0 ්‍යයෙකි .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 0 තාවය .
SFX 2045 Y 1
SFX 2045 0 මිණි .
SFX 3887 Y 1
SFX 3887 0 නිස් .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 ල්ලයි .
SFX 4578 Y 1
SFX 4578 0 ෝපායක් .
SFX 4106 Y 1
SFX 4106 0 කුඩා .
SFX 4105 Y 1
SFX 4105 0 කුඩු .
SFX 937 Y 1
SFX 937 0 ැල්ල .
SFX 2709 Y 1
SFX 2709 0 දුරට .
SFX 1627 Y 1
SFX 1627 0 ලයක .
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 0 ලයට .
SFX 4657 Y 1
SFX 4657 0 ේකම් .
SFX 3930 Y 1
SFX 3930 0 දුරු .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 කරවන .
SFX 500 Y 1
SFX 500 0 ලයි .
SFX 1209 Y 1
SFX 1209 0 ලයේ .
SFX 4453 Y 1
SFX 4453 0 ්දේසි .
SFX 4505 Y 1
SFX 4505 0 ්තරයක් .
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 0 කාලයේ .
SFX 2157 Y 1
SFX 2157 0 කරවා .
SFX 1436 Y 1
SFX 1436 0 චාර .
SFX 2664 Y 1
SFX 2664 0 න්ටයි .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 0 ෝල් .
SFX 4464 Y 1
SFX 4464 0 ්දැයි .
SFX 2581 Y 1
SFX 2581 0 යෝත් .
SFX 1981 Y 1
SFX 1981 0 වත්තේ .
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 0 නයෙන් .
SFX 2446 Y 1
SFX 2446 0 ශීල .
SFX 1821 Y 1
SFX 1821 0 ුම්වලින් .
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 0 ගැසී .
SFX 3846 Y 1
SFX 3846 0 පතින් .
SFX 3847 Y 1
SFX 3847 0 පතිනි .
SFX 3801 Y 1
SFX 3801 0 බෝධි .
SFX 3261 Y 1
SFX 3261 0 ාලයත් .
SFX 3252 Y 1
SFX 3252 0 ාවනට .
SFX 720 Y 1
SFX 720 0 වූත් .
SFX 4067 Y 1
SFX 4067 0 ගුල් .
SFX 1447 Y 1
SFX 1447 0 කිරි .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 0 න්නක් .
SFX 1237 Y 1
SFX 1237 0 න්නකි .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 0 යක්ද .
SFX 4148 Y 1
SFX 4148 0 කරලීමට .
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 යක්ම .
SFX 2596 Y 1
SFX 2596 0 යක්ය .
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 0 ාවන් .
SFX 1073 Y 1
SFX 1073 0 රණය .
SFX 566 Y 1
SFX 566 0 ේදීත් .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 0 යක්ව .
SFX 4003 Y 1
SFX 4003 0 තයටත් .
SFX 4374 Y 1
SFX 4374 0 ්මුදලි .
SFX 4380 Y 1
SFX 4380 0 ්මලේ .
SFX 2591 Y 1
SFX 2591 0 යාවන් .
SFX 4107 Y 1
SFX 4107 0 කුකුළා .
SFX 758 Y 1
SFX 758 0 ්නාක් .
SFX 3728 Y 1
SFX 3728 0 ‍යතාව .
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 0 තුමාගේ .
SFX 1919 Y 1
SFX 1919 0 ස්සා .
SFX 1897 Y 1
SFX 1897 0 ාන්විත .
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 0 ්වූවා .
SFX 4218 Y 1
SFX 4218 0 ්වූවේ .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 විණි .
SFX 839 Y 1
SFX 839 0 ිවන .
SFX 3109 Y 1
SFX 3109 0 ිවය .
SFX 710 Y 1
SFX 710 0 ිවල .
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 0 ාත්මකව .
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 0 ිවී .
SFX 1155 Y 1
SFX 1155 0 ිවූ .
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 0 ිවේ .
SFX 3611 Y 1
SFX 3611 0 ලාගෙන .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 ූයේ .
SFX 2090 Y 1
SFX 2090 0 නුවර .
SFX 4026 Y 1
SFX 4026 0 ණයකින් .
SFX 1239 Y 1
SFX 1239 0 නුවා .
SFX 3092 Y 1
SFX 3092 0 ීයත්වයක් .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 0 ජෝති .
SFX 2089 Y 1
SFX 2089 0 නුවේ .
SFX 4108 Y 1
SFX 4108 0 කුකුලා .
SFX 2156 Y 1
SFX 2156 0 කර්ම .
SFX 2387 Y 1
SFX 2387 0 ාධිකරණය .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 කරලා .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 ්වින් .
SFX 3881 Y 1
SFX 3881 0 නෙක් .
SFX 2672 Y 1
SFX 2672 0 නෙකි .
SFX 1678 Y 1
SFX 1678 0 නෙකු .
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 0 ාවලියට .
SFX 3484 Y 1
SFX 3484 0 වැලට .
SFX 2777 Y 1
SFX 2777 0 ගෙනුත් .
SFX 1675 Y 1
SFX 1675 0 නේත් .
SFX 4127 Y 1
SFX 4127 0 කාරවරයා .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 ාරාමය .
SFX 3406 Y 1
SFX 3406 0 සිංහයන් .
SFX 1882 Y 1
SFX 1882 0 ාවලියේ .
SFX 1958 Y 1
SFX 1958 0 වැල් .
SFX 1059 Y 1
SFX 1059 0 වගේ .
SFX 1017 Y 1
SFX 1017 0 ීම්වලට .
SFX 3575 Y 1
SFX 3575 0 ල්වල .
SFX 3486 Y 1
SFX 3486 0 වැඩියාව .
SFX 4504 Y 1
SFX 4504 0 ්තසිංහ .
SFX 1854 Y 1
SFX 1854 0 ිමට .
SFX 1539 Y 1
SFX 1539 0 ිමය .
SFX 2246 Y 1
SFX 2246 0 ෙක්ද .
SFX 4732 Y 1
SFX 4732 0 ෙක්ම .
SFX 4858 Y 1
SFX 4858 0 ුන්දි .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 ්‍යයයි .
SFX 4738 Y 1
SFX 4738 0 ෙකුගෙන් .
SFX 4351 Y 1
SFX 4351 0 ්‍යයයේ .
SFX 4095 Y 1
SFX 4095 0 ගඟ .
SFX 4430 Y 1
SFX 4430 0 ්නදැයි .
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 0 ගත .
SFX 3136 Y 1
SFX 3136 0 ිම් .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 ගන .
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 ගම .
SFX 1026 Y 1
SFX 1026 0 ිමි .
SFX 899 Y 1
SFX 899 0 කරුවන්ගෙන් .
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 0 ගය .
SFX 1160 Y 1
SFX 1160 0 ිමු .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 ගල .
SFX 2317 Y 1
SFX 2317 0 ිමේ .
SFX 1198 Y 1
SFX 1198 0 වයකට .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 ගහ .
SFX 1108 Y 1
SFX 1108 0 ග් .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 0 ගා .
SFX 2782 Y 1
SFX 2782 0 ගී .
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 0 ගෙ .
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ගේ .
SFX 4061 Y 1
SFX 4061 0 ගෝ .
SFX 2573 Y 1
SFX 2573 0 රාජයා .
SFX 528 Y 1
SFX 528 0 වයක් .
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 0 වයකි .
SFX 3544 Y 1
SFX 3544 0 වයකු .
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 0 යකුට .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 යකුද .
SFX 2532 Y 1
SFX 2532 0 වගාව .
SFX 2643 Y 1
SFX 2643 0 පන්දු .
SFX 3170 Y 1
SFX 3170 0 ිතයන්ගේ .
SFX 3732 Y 1
SFX 3732 0 යකුව .
SFX 3884 Y 1
SFX 3884 0 නුම් .
SFX 2044 Y 1
SFX 2044 0 මුත් .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 0 දායකය .
SFX 4889 Y 1
SFX 4889 0 ුණායින් .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 ්ඩන් .
SFX 2295 Y 1
SFX 2295 0 ිවෙනවා .
SFX 766 Y 1
SFX 766 0 ුණොත් .
SFX 4350 Y 1
SFX 4350 0 ්යයා .
SFX 4241 Y 1
SFX 4241 0 ්වැඩියා .
SFX 3282 Y 1
SFX 3282 0 ාමත් .
SFX 4511 Y 1
SFX 4511 0 ්තමට .
SFX 3478 Y 1
SFX 3478 0 විටෙක .
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 0 ්තම් .
SFX 1228 Y 1
SFX 1228 0 මුල්ල .
SFX 3640 Y 1
SFX 3640 0 රුකම් .
SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 0 පතට .
SFX 2708 Y 1
SFX 2708 0 දෙණිය .
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 0 පත් .
SFX 1670 Y 1
SFX 1670 0 පතා .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 පති .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 0 ේයැයි .
SFX 1086 Y 1
SFX 1086 0 පතේ .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 0 යැයි .
SFX 3302 Y 1
SFX 3302 0 ාධික .
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 0 ිල් .
SFX 375 Y 1
SFX 375 0 ිලා .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 ිලි .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 සූරිය .
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 0 ධර්ම .
SFX 3786 Y 1
SFX 3786 0 මනින්ම .
SFX 4144 Y 1
SFX 4144 0 කර්මයට .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 යටද .
SFX 3746 Y 1
SFX 3746 0 මෙහිලා .
SFX 502 Y 1
SFX 502 0 යටම .
SFX 963 Y 1
SFX 963 0 යටය .
SFX 2667 Y 1
SFX 2667 0 නේදැයි .
SFX 1642 Y 1
SFX 1642 0 රයක .
SFX 1071 Y 1
SFX 1071 0 රයට .
SFX 2015 Y 1
SFX 2015 0 රයා .
SFX 2014 Y 1
SFX 2014 0 රයි .
SFX 4427 Y 1
SFX 4427 0 ්නයෙන් .
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 0 රයේ .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 0 කයකුගේ .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 දේශයෙන් .
SFX 3318 Y 1
SFX 3318 0 ාගැන්මට .
SFX 690 Y 1
SFX 690 0 කරුට .
