lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
කවර/2,3,4,5,13,15,19,26,48,155,184,225,238,279,436,462,473,592,649,3015,3340
කාර/2,5,16,17,27,42,47,51,81,136,167,169,195,291,297,315,331,437,471,496,685,810,1075,1119,1242,1262,1276,1346,1418,1507,1530,2021,2133,2216,2323,2581,2583,4019,4152,4153,4366,4367,4368,4369,4376,4377,4888
කාර්ය/1,2,4,9,13,15,19,21,27,38,41,43,46,62,70,186,296,325,383,552,777,1034,1171,1358,1571,1572,1890,1908,2372,2400,3258,3259,3260,3261,3326,3705,3791,4170
කුස/1,3,6,15,18,21,32,49,56,69,216,275,1390,1466,1750,1791,2846,2847,3609,4070,4838
කොට්ට/30,180,3246,3740
කොර/3,18,20,33,37,42,47,63,69,103,165,168,240,290,301,303,314,393,485,643,679,750,772,802,1440,1850,1896,2292,2308,2309,3123,3322,3333,3596,3906
ක්‍රි/4,93,987,2415,2442,3437,4165,4917
තාප/2,20,21,60,221,1435,3417
තුන/1,3,4,5,7,8,11,16,17,18,22,23,28,32,42,77,85,109,116,153,174,228,349,416,2847,2850,2858,3361,4237,4238,4262,4456,4465,4650
තුන්/1228,2109,2114,2410,3393,3622
තුර/9,20,24,34,121,168,193,287,737,1267,1507,2252,3052,4559,4799,4802
දළු/10,30,69,277,601,2071,3618,3749
දාර/2,79,1822,4610
දැල/1,3,4,5,7,16,17,22,99,110,152,360,510,615,694,903,1124,1284,1285,1469,1470,2173,2849,2878,4283
දෙහි/26,2775,4092,4175
නැවැත/42,51,211,216,472,584,1823
නිවන/4,5,6,32,55,620,838,1342,4182,4945
පක්ෂපාත/10,16,42,161,494,1150,1346,1839,2323
පත්කිරීම/77,759
පමණ/1,2,4,8,11,12,13,16,17,18,22,23,39,42,76,174,228,254,466,537,1093,1733,2136,2796
පරිසමාප්ත/21,51,288,427,3263
පාව/20,42,102,157,230,243,2252,3052,3362
පිටත්/36,76,86,131,218,268,344,536
පින්/1403,1414,3403,3410,3619,3620
පිහිට/1,4,7,11,16,20,24,33,51,52,56,59,64,76,80,82,103,113,117,126,131,177,179,209,216,218,262,266,272,288,301,379,517,658,679,704,845,916,1019,1022,1316,1498,1509,1510,1683,2258,2262,3036,3037,3038,3039,3179,3221,4770,4775,4778,4783
පුරවා/961,4091
පොල/1,3,4,5,7,10,16,20,24,36,37,42,51,79,99,110,152,167,169,474,495,522,616,756,923,1303,1304,1755,2313,2947,2967,3089,3100,3101,3102,3517,3518,4276,4300,4380,4539,4540,4554,4557,4602,4603,4604,4614,4615,4616,4617,4618,4996,4997,4999
පෝය/1,16,324
පෝෂ/33,302,739,933,2828
ප්‍රබෝධය/1,3,4,17,23,28,308,1058,1901
බලාගාර/26,48
බෑම/4,7,31,834
බිල/2,4,5,13,16,20,38,42,51,290,924,1003,1005,2334,2899,2900,2902,3130,4282,4406,4407,4520,4623,4686
මහව/1879,3115
මුහුණ/1,3,4,6,7,18,24,25,28,69,117,204,214,454,475,484,505,560,744,745,747,976,977,1225,1405,1666,1700,2711,3043,3969,3970,4785
මෙහෙ/2,6,8,9,13,15,19,27,43,48,52,53,66,76,78,92,112,119,177,186,250,396,408,570,637,748,790,1078,1609,1945,2496,2505,2587,3524,3691,3704,3705,3706,4461
මෙහෙය/35,76,88,126,131,133,143,145,177,217,218,287,393,572,586,704,721,722,724,782,784,785,791,834,835,1321,1369,1515,1821,1875,2271,2272,2350,2514,3059,3060,3063,3066,3216,3218,3219,3558,4832
රතු/6,1735,2050,2074,2640,4103
රාව/2,3,13,24,106,390,471,1148
රුහ/4866
වදුල/3,18,22,24,32,1755
වර්ග/2,11,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,43,46,47,48,60,93,146,170,200,295,383,604,734,1050,1334,1396,1434,1657,1840,2763,2771,3089,4050,4979
වික්‍රම/2,5,27,97,186,321,421,433,451,551,715,1704,1897,2064,3273,3406
විචාරක/1398
විනෝද/13,19,21,53,88,281,686,861,1572,1739,1908,3326
විශේෂ/2,6,8,11,12,13,15,19,21,26,27,30,46,49,73,81,97,106,137,182,198,259,302,427,663,988,1098,1262,1264,1265,1266,1422,1718,1719,1720,1909,2768,3327,4043,4044,4045,4046
වෛර/2,13,15,19,21,30,42,46,48,93,139,353,798,1184,1579,1581,1940,2215,3372,3416
ශ්‍රද්ධාව/4,308
සත්/400,2049,2745,2747
සනීප/2,11,19,941,1893
සඳක/5,319,2354
සමතුලිත/10,809
සම්පත/1,3,4,5,11,18,23,28,99,110,152,193,285,460,558,3684
සහභාගී/88,197,217,2517,3971
සාකච්ඡාව/1,3,4,7,9,12,17,22,23,28,34,41,56,91,104,109,148,157,269,308,692,792,1280,1630
සිය/1,2,3,4,6,13,15,19,20,22,38,43,46,48,71,192,194,216,219,221,482,540,569,640,675,745,799,1601,1640,1700,1937,2795,2956,3214,3616,3843,4575,4834
ස්ථාවර/2,10,13,15,19,27,38,73,141,186,205,296,368,455,1402,1654
ස්නේහ/2,398,798
හතර/1,3,4,7,8,11,17,22,23,28,31,49,52,116,228,271,308,354,416,664,975,1507,1595,1874,2482,3361
හමුදා/469,1087,2080,3844
හැදි/9,27,56,69,708,920,1394,1395,2028,2029,2650,2772
හොරණ/3205
